Utah statutes.
78A-2-303.   False affidavit -- Penalty.

(1)  A person may assert by affidavit that an affidavit of impecuniosity, action, or appeal is:

(a)  false;

(b)  frivolous or without merit; or

(c)  malicious.

(2)  Upon receipt of an affidavit in accordance with Subsection (1), the court may notify the affiant of the challenge and set a date, not less than five days from receipt of the notice, requiring the affiant to appear and show cause why the affiant should not be required to:

(a)  post a bond for the costs of the action or appeal; or

(b)  pay the legal fees for the action or appeal.

(3)  The court may dismiss the action or appeal if:

(a)  the affiant does not appear;

(b)  the affiant appears and the court determines the affidavit is false, frivolous, without merit, or malicious; or

(c)  the court orders the affiant to post a bond or pay the legal fees and the affiant fails to do so.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

